Hawaii statutes.
§476-25 Prohibition of removal or sale
without notice. Unless the contract otherwise provides, the buyer may,
without the consent of the seller, remove the goods from the island in which
the goods are first kept for use by the buyer after the sale and sell,
mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the buyer's interest in the goods; but prior
to full compliance by the buyer with the terms of the contract, the buyer shall
not remove the goods from the island except for temporary use for a period of
not more than thirty days unless the buyer not less than ten days before the
removal gives the seller written notice, either personally or by registered or
certified mail, of the place to which the goods are to be removed and the
approximate time of the intended removal; and prior to full compliance by the
buyer with the terms of the contract the buyer shall not sell, mortgage, or
otherwise dispose of the buyer's interest in the goods, unless the person to
whom the buyer is about to sell, mortgage, or otherwise transfer the goods
notifies the seller in writing, either personally or by registered or certified
mail, of the name and address of the person to whom the buyer's interest in the
goods is about to be sold, mortgaged, or otherwise transferred. [L 1961, c 102,
pt of §1; Supp, §201A-29; HRS §476-30; am and ren L 1984, c 86, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next